Utah statutes.
78B-5-414.   Supplementary general principles of law.
Unless displaced by particular provisions of this part, the principles of law
and equity, including the law merchant, and the law relative to capacity to
contract, principal and agent, estoppel, fraud, misrepresentation, duress,
coercion, mistake, bankruptcy, or other validating or invalidating causes
supplement its provisions.
